Wisconsin, session 2025, AB298.
do enact as follows:AB298,14Section 1. 165.88 (3m) (d) of the statutes is repealed.AB298,25Section 2. 165.88 (3t) of the statutes is created to read:AB298,2,21165.88 (3t) Grants to technical colleges for interactive critical 2mapping data. (a) In this subsection:AB298,2,331. “District board” has the meaning given in s. 38.01 (6).AB298,2,442. “Interactive critical mapping data” has the meaning given in sub. (3m) (ac).AB298,2,85(b) The office of school safety shall award grants to district boards to be used 6to submit interactive critical mapping data of the district boards’ technical college 7buildings to each local law enforcement agency with jurisdiction and to the office of 8school safety.AB298,2,129(c) The office of school safety shall accept applications for the grants under 10this subsection from the president of the technical college system board, who shall 11work jointly with the district boards and the local law enforcement agencies with 12jurisdiction to apply for the grants.AB298,2,2113(d) Grant moneys awarded under this subsection shall be used for site-specific 14interactive critical mapping data to enhance security and increase situational 15awareness for first responders. Any interactive critical mapping data created with 16grant money under this subsection shall be compatible with platforms and 17applications used by local, state, and federal public safety officials; may not require 18local, state, or federal public safety officials or district boards to purchase additional 19software; and shall include information that can best assist first responders in an 20emergency, such as building numbers, floors, suite designations, room numbers, or 21other available relevant location information.AB298,322Section 3. 165.88 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:AB298,3,223165.88 (4) Report. The department of justice shall submit an annual report 24to the cochairpersons of the joint committee on finance providing an account of the 1grants awarded under sub. subs. (2), (3m), and (3t) and the expenditures made with 2the grant moneys.AB298,3,33